Wisconsin, session 2025, AB634.
do enact as follows:AB634,11Section 1. 66.0511 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB634,2,2266.0511 (5) Release of data to public. (a) In this subsection:AB634,2,631. “Critical incident” means any occurrence of great bodily harm, as defined in 4s. 939.22 (14), or death to an individual in the presence or custody of a law 5enforcement officer regardless of whether it was caused by the law enforcement 6officer.AB634,3,272. “Data” includes all data from a body camera, data from a camera from a 8vehicle used by a law enforcement officer, audio recordings of emergency phone 9calls, video or other recordings captured by a law enforcement agency, and video or 1other recordings captured by members of the public that are in the possession of a 2law enforcement agency.AB634,3,433. “Release” means to make viewable and printable to the public via a digital 4platform at no charge.AB634,3,554. “Victim” has the meaning given in s. 950.02 (4) (a).AB634,3,76(b) A law enforcement agency shall release data relating to any of the 7following incidents within 15 days of the incident:AB634,3,981. Subject to s. 175.47 (5) (b), an officer-involved death, as defined in s. 175.47 9(1) (c), involving an officer employed by the law enforcement agency.AB634,3,11102. A critical incident involving a law enforcement officer employed by the law 11enforcement agency.AB634,3,15123. An incident involving the death of an individual if the incident involved the 13discharge of a firearm by a law enforcement officer employed by the law 14enforcement agency regardless of whether the death resulted from the firearm 15discharge.AB634,3,2216(c) Data released under par. (b) shall include at a minimum data relating to 17the actions and events leading up to the incident, including video and audio if 18available. A law enforcement agency is not required to release duplicative or 19redundant data except that, if a member of the public requests a copy of data 20released under par. (b), the law enforcement agency shall provide the data in the 21form requested and may charge only for the actual cost of the materials needed to 22provide the data in that form.AB634,4,223(d) The following data are exempt from the requirement under par. (b) and the 1data may be redacted, distorted, or edited, or withheld completely, in accordance 2with the confidentiality afforded by the exemption:AB634,4,331. Data that are covered by 18 USC 2721.AB634,4,542. Records that are confidential under s. 48.396 (1), 165.68 (4) (d) 1., or 5938.396 (1) (a).AB634,4,1163. Data that are requested to be kept confidential by an adult victim of a crime 7that is pertinent to the data if the victim is identifiable in the data; by a parent or 8legal guardian of a victim of a crime that is pertinent to the data if the victim is not 9an adult and is identifiable in the data; or by an adult family member or cohabitant 10of a deceased victim of a crime that is pertinent to the data if the victim is 11identifiable in the data.AB634,4,12124. Data that are redacted or edited for any of the following reasons:AB634,4,1413a. To protect the privacy interests of individuals who are identifiable in the 14data.AB634,4,1615b. To obscure images depicting nudity or great bodily injury or to obscure 16images or sounds that could be disturbing.AB634,4,1717c. To protect confidential medical or mental health information.AB634,4,1818d. To protect the identity of an informant.AB634,4,2019e. To prevent the disclosure of confidential strategies for crime detection, 20prevention, and investigation.AB634,4,2121f. To prevent the loss of state or federal aid.AB634,4,2222g. To prevent a security risk at a secured facility.AB634,4,2323h. To mitigate a particularized, specific risk to a specified person’s safety.AB634,5,41(e) A law enforcement agency may not alter data that are subject to the 2requirement under par. (b) except as provided in par. (d), and if a law enforcement 3agency alters data as provided in par. (d), the law enforcement agency must retain 4the unaltered data consistent with its records retention policy.AB634,5,105(f) 1. A law enforcement agency that has possession of data that may be 6subject to alteration under par. (d) at the request of another person shall make 7reasonable attempts to notify the person and provide the person an opportunity to 8review the data within 48 hours of the incident. This subdivision does not apply if 9there is reasonable suspicion that the person is a witness to or otherwise involved in 10the incident.AB634,5,14112. A law enforcement agency that has possession of data that are subject to the 12requirement under par. (b) shall notify the following persons, or an attorney 13representing the person, at least 48 hours before release and provide the following 14persons an opportunity to review the data before release:AB634,5,1715a. An employee of the law enforcement agency who can be identified in the 16data or who is significantly involved in the incident that is the subject of the data 17and any union that represents the employee.AB634,5,1918b. An individual who can be identified in the data if an employee of the law 19enforcement agency used force against him or her.AB634,5,2120c. An individual who can be identified in the data if the individual is under 18 21years of age.AB634,5,2322d. An individual who can be identified in the data if the individual is a victim 23of a crime that is pertinent to the data.AB634,6,11e. The office of the district attorney with jurisdiction.AB634,22Section 2. 165.87 (1) (c) and (d) of the statutes are amended to read:AB634,6,53165.87 (1) (c) Train all employees that use, maintain, store, or release data 4from a body camera on the policy under par. (a) and on the requirements under 5subs. (2) and (3) and s. 66.0511 (5).AB634,6,86(d) Periodically review practices regarding the body cameras and data from 7body cameras to ensure compliance with the policy under par. (a) and the 8requirements under subs. (2) and (3) and s. 66.0511 (5).AB634,39Section 3. 165.87 (3) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB634,6,1210165.87 (3) (e) Nothing This subsection does not apply to data that are subject 11to s. 66.0511 (5) (b), and nothing in this subsection prohibits the release of data 12from a body camera under s. 175.47 (5) (b).AB634,413Section 4. 175.47 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB634,6,1914175.47 (5) (b) If the district attorney determines there is no basis to prosecute 15the law enforcement officer involved in the officer-involved death, the investigators 16conducting the investigation under sub. (3) (a) shall release the report, except that 17the investigators shall, before releasing the report, delete any information that 18would not be subject to disclosure pursuant to a request release under s. 19.35 (1) 19(a) 66.0511 (5) (d).AB634,6,2020